Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202610-405
County and city bonds; payment; tax levy.

It shall be the duty of the proper officers of such county or city to cause to be annually levied, collected, and paid to the holders of such bonds a special tax on all taxable property within the county or city sufficient to pay the annual interest and principal of the bonds. Not more than twenty percent of the principal of such bonds shall be collected in any one year.

Laws 1869, § 5, p. 93;

Laws 1870, § 2, p. 15;

R.S.1913, § 409;

C.S.1922, § 326;

C.S.1929, § 11-405;

R.S.1943, § 10-405;

Laws 1947, c. 15, § 4, p. 83;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 45.

Sanitary districts never have been included. Lang v. Sanitary District, 160 Neb. 754, 71 N.W.2d 608 (1955).

Where bonds are issued by county to aid in construction of a railroad, taxable property in territory added to the county after the voting of bonds is liable to taxation for their payment. Chicago, St. P., M. & O. Ry. Co. v. Cuming County, 31 Neb. 374, 47 N.W. 1121 (1891).